Utah statutes.
38-1-39.   Waiver or impairment of a lien right -- Forms -- Scope.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Check" means a payment instrument on a depository institution including:
(i)  a check;
(ii)  a draft;
(iii)  an order; or
(iv)  other instrument.
(b)  "Depository institution" is as defined in Section 7-1-103.
(c)  "Lien claimant" means a person that claims a lien under this chapter.
(d)  "Receives payment" means, in the case of a restrictive endorsement, a
payee has endorsed a check and the check is presented to and paid by the
depository institution on which it is drawn.
(2)  Notwithstanding Section 38-1-29, a written consent given by a lien
claimant that waives or limits the lien claimant's lien rights is enforceable
only if the lien claimant:
(a) (i)  executes a waiver and release that is signed by the lien claimant or
the lien claimant's authorized agent; or
(ii)  for a restrictive endorsement on a check, includes a restrictive
endorsement on a check that is:
(A)  signed by the lien claimant or the lien claimant's authorized agent; and
(B)  in substantially the same form set forth in Subsection (4)(d); and
(b)  receives payment of the amount identified in the waiver and release or
check that includes the restrictive endorsement:
(i)  including payment by a joint payee check; and
(ii)  for a progress payment, only to the extent of the payment.
(3) (a)  Notwithstanding the language of a waiver and release described in
Subsection (2), Subsection (3)(b) applies if:
(i)  the payment given in exchange for any waiver and release of lien is made
by check; and
(ii)  the check fails to clear the depository institution on which it is drawn
for any reason.
(b)  If the conditions of Subsection (3)(a) are met:
(i)  the waiver and release described in Subsection (3)(a) is null, void, and
of no legal effect; and
(ii)  the following will not be affected by the lien claimant's execution of
the waiver and release:
(A)  any lien;
(B)  any lien right;
(C)  any bond right;
(D)  any contract right; or
(E)  any other right to recover payment afforded to the lien claimant in law
or equity.
(4) (a)  A waiver and release given by a lien claimant meets the requirements
of this section if it is in substantially the form provided in this Subsection
(4) for the circumstance provided in this Subsection (4).
(b)  A waiver and release may be in substantially the following form if the
lien claimant is required to execute a waiver and release in exchange for or
to induce the payment of a progress billing:
"UTAH CONDITIONAL WAIVER AND RELEASE UPON PROGRESS PAYMENT
Property Name: _____________________________________________________________
Property Location: ___________________________________________________________
Undersigned's Customer: _____________________________________________________
Invoice/Payment Application Number: __________________________________________
Payment Amount: ___________________________________________________________
Payment Period: ____________________________________________________________
To the extent provided below, this document becomes effective to release and
the undersigned is considered to waive any notice of lien or right under Utah
Code Ann., Title 38, Chapter 1, Mechanics' Liens, or any bond right under Utah
Code Ann., Title 14, Contractors' Bonds, or Section 63G-6-505 related to
payment rights the undersigned has on the above described Property once:
(1)  the undersigned endorses a check in the above referenced Payment Amount
payable to the undersigned; and
(2)  the check is paid by the depository institution on which it is drawn.
This waiver and release applies to a progress payment for the work, materials,
equipment, or a combination of work, materials, and equipment furnished by the
undersigned to the Property or to the Undersigned's Customer which are the
subject of the Invoice or Payment Application, but only to the extent of the
Payment Amount.  This waiver and release does not apply to any retention
withheld; any items, modifications, or changes pending approval; disputed
items and claims; or items furnished or invoiced after the Payment Period.
The undersigned warrants that the undersigned either has already paid or will
use the money the undersigned receives from this progress payment promptly to
pay in full all the undersigned's laborers, subcontractors, materialmen, and
suppliers for all work, materials, equipment, or combination of work,
materials, and equipment that are the subject of this waiver and release.
Dated: ________________________
___________________________________________________________(Company Name)
_____________________________________________________By:__________________
_____________________________________________________Its:__________________"
(c)  A waiver and release may be in substantially the following form if the
lien claimant is required to execute a waiver and release in exchange for or
to induce the payment of a final billing:
"UTAH WAIVER AND RELEASE UPON FINAL PAYMENT
Property Name: ____________________________________________________________
Property Location: __________________________________________________________
Undersigned's Customer: _____________________________________________________
Invoice/Payment Application Number: __________________________________________
Payment Amount: ___________________________________________________________

To the extent provided below, this document becomes effective to release and
the undersigned is considered to waive any notice of lien or right under Utah
Code Ann., Title 38, Chapter 1, Mechanics' Liens, or any bond right under Utah
Code Ann., Title 14, Contractors' Bonds, or Section 63G-6-505 related to
payment rights the undersigned has on the above described Property once:
(1)  the undersigned endorses a check in the above referenced Payment Amount
payable to the undersigned; and
(2)  the check is paid by the depository institution on which it is drawn.
This waiver and release applies to the final payment for the work, materials,
equipment, or combination of work, materials, and equipment furnished by the
undersigned to the Property or to the Undersigned's Customer.
The undersigned warrants that the undersigned either has already paid or will
use the money the undersigned receives from the final payment promptly to pay
in full all the undersigned's laborers, subcontractors, materialmen, and
suppliers for all work, materials, equipment, or combination of work,
materials, and equipment that are the subject of this waiver and release.
Dated: ________________________
___________________________________________________________(Company Name)
_____________________________________________________By:__________________
_____________________________________________________Its:__________________"
(d)  A restrictive endorsement placed on a check to effectuate a waiver and
release described in this Subsection (4) meets the requirements of this
section if it is in substantially the following form:
"This check is a progress/ final payment for property described on this check
sufficient for identification.  Endorsement of this check is an acknowledgment
by the endorser that the waiver and release to which the payment applies is
effective to the extent provided in Utah Code Ann. Subsection 38-1-39(4)(b) or
(c) respectively."
(e) (i)  If using a restrictive endorsement under Subsection (4)(d), the
person preparing the check shall indicate whether the check is for a progress
payment or a final payment by circling the word "progress" if the check is for
a progress payment, or the word "final" if the check is for a final payment.
(ii)  If a restrictive endorsement does not indicate whether the check is for
a progress payment or a final payment, it is considered to be for a progress
payment.
(5) (a)  If the conditions of Subsection (5)(b) are met, this section does not
affect the enforcement of:
(i)  an accord and satisfaction regarding a bona fide dispute; or
(ii)  an agreement made in settlement of an action pending in any court or
arbitration.
(b)  Pursuant to Subsection (5)(a), this section does not affect enforcement
of an accord and satisfaction or settlement described in Subsection (5)(a) if
the accord and satisfaction or settlement:
(i)  is in a writing signed by the lien claimant; and
(ii)  specifically references the lien rights waived or impaired.
